Florida, session 2026, SB682.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 104 105 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âDomestic Emergency 106 and Batterers Reform and Accountability Act.â 107 Section 2.âSubsection (6) of section 365.171, Florida 108 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (e) is added to subsection 109 (4) of that section, to read: 110 365.171âEmergency communications state plan.â 111 (4)âSTATE PLAN.âThe office shall develop, maintain, and 112 implement appropriate modifications for a statewide emergency 113 communications plan. The plan shall provide for: 114 (e)âA system or process to flag addresses at which a â911â 115 call was placed to local emergency services to report that an 116 incident of domestic violence or dating violence has occurred. 117 Such system must correspond between all emergency services, 118 including, but not limited to, law enforcement, firefighting, 119 emergency medical services, poison control, suicide prevention, 120 and emergency management services. An address must remain 121 flagged in the system for at least 1 year after the â911â call 122 was placed that initiated the flag. The 1-year time period 123 resets after each call relating to an allegation of an incident 124 of domestic violence or dating violence at the same address. 125 126 The office shall be responsible for the implementation and 127 coordination of such plan. The office shall adopt any necessary 128 rules and schedules related to public agencies for implementing 129 and coordinating the plan, pursuant to chapter 120. 130 (6)âREGIONAL SYSTEMS.âThis section does not prohibit or 131 discourage the formation of multijurisdictional or regional 132 systems; and any system established pursuant to this section may 133 include the jurisdiction, or any portion thereof, of more than 134 one public agency. It is the intent of the Legislature that 135 emergency communications services be available throughout the 136 state. Expenditure by counties of the fee authorized and imposed 137 under s. 365.172 should support this intent to the greatest 138 extent feasible within the context of local service needs and 139 fiscal capability. Each county shall integrate the system or 140 process created in paragraph (4)(e) based on the countyâs 141 resources and availability. This section does not prohibit two 142 or more counties from establishing a combined emergency 143 communications service by an interlocal agreement and using the 144 fees authorized and imposed by s. 365.172 for such combined 145 service. 146 Section 3.âSubsections (4), (5), and (11) of section 147 401.27, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (c) is 148 added to subsection (2) of that section, to read: 149 401.27âPersonnel; standards and certification.â 150 (2)âThe department shall establish by rule educational and 151 training criteria and examinations for the certification and 152 recertification of emergency medical technicians and paramedics. 153 Such rules must require, but need not be limited to: 154 (c)âFor emergency medical technicians and paramedics, a 155 training program approved by the department for instruction in 156 the subject of domestic violence, dating violence, and 157 strangulation. 158 (4)âAn applicant for certification or recertification as an 159 emergency medical technician or paramedic must do all of the 160 following: 161 (a)âHave completed an appropriate training program as 162 follows: 163 1.âFor an emergency medical technician, an emergency 164 medical technician training program approved by the department 165 as equivalent to the most recent EMT-Basic National Standard 166 Curriculum or the National EMS Education Standards of the United 167 States Department of Transportation; or 168 2.âFor a paramedic, a paramedic training program approved 169 by the department as equivalent to the most recent EMT-Paramedic 170 National Standard Curriculum or the National EMS Education 171 Standards of the United States Department of Transportation.; 172 (b)âHave completed a training program approved by the 173 department for instruction in the subject of domestic violence, 174 dating violence, and strangulation. 175 1.âBeginning July 1, 2026, emergency medical technicians 176 and paramedics seeking initial certification must complete a 177 minimum of 2 hours of training in handling domestic violence, 178 dating violence, and strangulation cases. 179 2.âEmergency medical technicians and paramedics who were 180 certified before July 1, 2026, must complete a minimum of 2 181 hours of training in handling domestic violence, dating 182 violence, and strangulation cases during the refresher training 183 program required under subsection (5). 184 (c)(b)âAttest that he or she is not addicted to alcohol or 185 any controlled substance.; 186 (d)(c)âAttest that he or she is free from any physical or 187 mental defect or disease that might impair the applicantâs 188 ability to perform his or her duties.; 189 (e)(d)âWithin 2 years after program completion have passed 190 an examination developed or required by the department.; 191 (f)1.(e)1.âFor an emergency medical technician, hold a 192 current American Heart Association cardiopulmonary resuscitation 193 course card or an American Red Cross cardiopulmonary 194 resuscitation course card or its equivalent as defined by 195 department rule; or 196 2.âFor a paramedic, hold a certificate of successful course 197 completion in advanced cardiac life support from the American 198 Heart Association or its equivalent as defined by department 199 rule.; 200 (g)(f)âSubmit the certification fee and the nonrefundable 201 examination fee prescribed in s. 401.34, which examination fee 202 will be required for each examination administered to an 203 applicant.; and 204 (h)(g)âSubmit a completed application to the department, 205 which application documents compliance with paragraphs (a)-(d), 206 (b), (c), (e), (f), (g), and this paragraph, and, if applicable, 207 paragraph (e) (d). 208 (5)(a)âThe department shall establish by rule a procedure 209 for biennial renewal certification of emergency medical 210 technicians. Such rules must require a United States Department 211 of Transportation refresher training program of at least 30 212 hours and a 2-hour training program for instruction in the 213 subject of domestic violence, dating violence, and strangulation 214 as approved by the department every 2 years. The refresher 215 program may be offered in multiple presentations spread over the 216 2-year period. The rules must also provide that the refresher 217 course requirement may be satisfied by passing a challenge 218 examination. 219 (b)âThe department shall establish by rule a procedure for 220 biennial renewal certification of paramedics. Such rules must 221 require candidates for renewal to have taken at least 30 hours 222 of continuing education units and a 2-hour training program for 223 instruction in the subject of domestic violence, dating 224 violence, and strangulation during the 2-year period. The rules 225 must provide that the continuing education requirement may be 226 satisfied by passing a challenge examination. 227 (11)âAn applicant for certification as an emergency medical 228 technician or a paramedic who is trained outside the state, or 229 trained in the military, must provide proof of a current, 230 nationally recognized emergency medical technician or paramedic 231 certification or registration that is recognized by the 232 department and based upon successful completion of a training 233 program approved by the department as being equivalent to the 234 most recent EMT-Basic or EMT-Paramedic National Standard 235 Curriculum or the National EMS Education Standards of the United 236 States Department of Transportation and hold a current 237 certificate of successful course completion in cardiopulmonary 238 resuscitation (CPR) or advanced cardiac life support for 239 emergency medical technicians or paramedics, respectively, to be 240 eligible for the certification. An applicant for certification 241 as an emergency medical technician or a paramedic who is trained 242 outside this state, or trained in the military, must provide 243 proof of successful completion of a training program that 244 included instruction on the subject of domestic violence, dating 245 violence, and strangulation as required under paragraph (4)(b). 246 Section 4.âPresent subsection (9) of section 633.408, 247 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (10), paragraph 248 (e) is added to subsection (1) of that section, and a new 249 subsection (9) is added to that section, to read: 250 633.408âFirefighter and volunteer firefighter training and 251 certification.â 252 (1)âThe division shall establish by rule: 253 (e)âCourses to provide training for career and volunteer 254 firefighters on the subject of domestic violence, dating 255 violence, and strangulation. Such training must be a requirement 256 for obtaining a Firefighter Certificate of Compliance, a 257 Volunteer Firefighter Certificate of Completion, or a Special 258 Certificate of Compliance. 259 (9)âThe division shall establish a program to provide 260 training in the subject of domestic violence, dating violence, 261 and strangulation for career and volunteer firefighters. 262 (a)âBeginning July 1, 2026, career and volunteer 263 firefighters seeking initial certification must complete a 264 minimum of 2 hours of training in handling domestic violence, 265 dating violence, and strangulation cases. 266 (b)âCareer and volunteer firefighters certified before July 267 1, 2026, must complete a minimum of 2 hours of training in 268 handling domestic violence, dating violence, and strangulation 269 cases during the continuing training required under paragraph 270 (1)(c). 271 Section 5.âPresent subsections (3) and (4) of section 272 741.28, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) 273 and (5), respectively, a new subsection (3) is added to that 274 section, and subsection (2) of that section is amended, to read: 275 741.28âDomestic violence; definitions.âAs used in ss. 276 741.28-741.31: 277 (2)ââDomestic violenceâ means any assault, aggravated 278 assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, sexual 279 battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false 280 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical 281 injury or death of one family or household member by another 282 family or household member. The term includes, but is not 283 limited to, the following criminal offenses: 284 (a)âAssault. 285 (b)âAggravated assault. 286 (c)âBattery. 287 (d)âAggravated battery. 288 (e)âBattery by strangulation. 289 (f)âDomestic battery by strangulation. 290 (g)âSexual assault. 291 (h)âSexual battery. 292 (i)âStalking. 293 (j)âAggravated stalking. 294 (k)âChild abuse. 295 (l)âAggravated child abuse. 296 (m)âKidnapping. 297 (n)âFalse imprisonment. 298 (o)âViolation of an injunction for protection against 299 domestic violence, repeat violence, dating violence, sexual 300 violence, or stalking. 301 (p)âCriminal mischief. 302 (q)âInstallation or use of tracking devices or tracking 303 applications. 304 (r)âSexual cyberharassment. 305 (s)âCyberstalking. 306 (t)âOffenses against users of computers, computer systems, 307 computer networks, and electronic devices. 308 (u)âCruelty to animals. 309 (3)ââElectronic monitoringâ means tracking the location of 310 a person through the use of technology that is capable of 311 determining or identifying the monitored personâs presence or 312 absence at a particular location, including, but not limited to: 313 (a)âRadio frequency signaling technology, which detects 314 whether the monitored person is or is not at an approved 315 location and notifies the monitoring agency of the time that the 316 monitored person either leaves the approved location or tampers 317 with or removes the monitoring device; or 318 (b)âActive or passive global positioning system technology, 319 which detects the location of the monitored person and notifies 320 the monitoring agency of the monitored personâs location and 321 which may also include electronic monitoring with victim 322 notification technology that is capable of notifying a victim or 323 protected party, either directly or through a monitoring agency, 324 if the monitored person enters within the restricted distance of 325 a victim or protected party or within the restricted distance of 326 a designated location. 327 Section 6.âSection 741.281, Florida Statutes, is amended to 328 read: 329 741.281âCourt to order batterersâ intervention program 330 attendance; electronic monitoring.â 331 (1)âIf a person is found guilty of, has adjudication 332 withheld on, or pleads nolo contendere to a crime of domestic 333 violence, as defined in s. 741.28, that person shall be ordered 334 by the court to a minimum term of 1 yearâs probation and the 335 court shall order that the defendant attend and complete a 336 batterersâ intervention program as a condition of probation. The 337 court must impose the condition of the batterersâ intervention 338 program for a defendant under this section, but the court, in 339 its discretion, may determine not to impose the condition if it 340 states on the record why a batterersâ intervention program might 341 be inappropriate. The court must impose the condition of the 342 batterersâ intervention program for a defendant placed on 343 probation unless the court determines that the person does not 344 qualify for the batterersâ intervention program pursuant to s. 345 741.325. The imposition of probation under this section does not 346 preclude the court from imposing any sentence of imprisonment 347 authorized by s. 775.082. 348 (2)âIf a person is found guilty of, has adjudication 349 withheld on, or pleads nolo contendere to a crime of domestic 350 violence, the court may order the person to have electronic 351 monitoring supervision. The court must order electronic 352 monitoring supervision in the following situations: 353 (a)âThe court finds there is clear and convincing evidence 354 that the defendant poses a continuing threat to the victim; 355 (b)âThe defendant has previously violated an injunction for 356 protection against domestic violence, dating violence, repeat 357 violence, sexual violence, or stalking; or 358 (c)âDuring a lethality assessment, if performed, there is 359 evidence of strangulation or other indications that warrant a 360 higher level of concern for the well-being of the petitioner. 361 Section 7.âSection 741.282, Florida Statutes, is created to 362 read: 363 741.282âDomestic violence diversion program.â 364 (1)âIf a diversion program is available and a person meets 365 the eligibility criteria, the court or state attorney may enter 366 into a written agreement with the person to participate in a 367 domestic violence diversion program. The Department of 368 Corrections shall supervise the domestic violence diversion 369 programs. 370 (2)âA person is eligible to participate in a domestic 371 violence diversion program if the person is charged with the 372 commission of a misdemeanor of domestic violence under s. 741.31 373 and the person is a first-time domestic violence offender. 374 (3)âThe written diversion agreement must include all of the 375 following conditions, which must be accepted by the person: 376 (a)âThe person admits his or her guilt. 377 (b)âThe person agrees to attend and participate in a 378 domestic violence diversion program. 379 (c)âThe person knowingly signs a waiver of his or her right 380 to a speedy trial for the period of his or her diversion. 381 (4)âA person who participates in a domestic violence 382 diversion program must: 383 (a)âAppear before the court within 45 days after entering 384 the domestic violence diversion program to determine the 385 personâs compliance with the conditions and requirements of the 386 written diversion agreement. The court may set additional status 387 hearings to monitor the personâs progress in the diversion 388 program. 389 (b)âComplete the domestic violence diversion program within 390 1 year after the person enters the diversion program. 391 (c)âComplete a batterersâ intervention program within 9 392 months after the person enters the diversion program. 393 (d)âParticipate in a clinical assessment conducted by a 394 qualified professional as defined in s. 39.01 to determine if 395 the person has mental health or substance use issues. 396 (5)âIf a qualified professional determines, after the 397 clinical assessment required under paragraph (4)(d), that the 398 person has mental health or substance use issues, the qualified 399 professional must provide a treatment plan for the person. A 400 qualified professional who provides a treatment plan for a 401 person in the diversion program must provide to the court weekly 402 treatment progress reports. 403 (6)âAt the end of the domestic violence diversion program, 404 the qualified professional must certify to the court that the 405 person has complied with all requirements of the treatment plan. 406 The court shall consider the recommendation of the state 407 attorney as to the disposition of the pending charges and 408 determine, by written finding, whether the person successfully 409 completed the domestic violence diversion program. The court 410 shall dismiss the charges upon finding the person has 411 successfully completed the diversion program. If the court finds 412 that the person has not successfully completed the diversion 413 program, the court must return the charges to the criminal 414 docket for prosecution. 415 Section 8.âSubsection (1) of section 741.283, Florida 416 Statutes, is amended to read: 417 741.283âMinimum term of imprisonment for domestic 418 violence.â 419 (1)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) or s. 741.282, 420 if a person is adjudicated guilty of a crime of domestic 421 violence, as defined in s. 741.28, and the person has 422 intentionally caused bodily harm to another person, the court 423 shall order the person to serve a minimum of 10 days in the 424 county jail for a first offense, 15 days for a second offense, 425 and 20 days for a third or subsequent offense as part of the 426 sentence imposed, unless the court sentences the person to a 427 nonsuspended period of incarceration in a state correctional 428 facility. 429 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 741.282, if a person is 430 adjudicated guilty of a crime of domestic violence, as defined 431 in s. 741.28, and the person has intentionally caused bodily 432 harm to another person, and the crime of domestic violence takes 433 place in the presence of a child under 16 years of age who is a 434 family or household member, as defined in s. 741.28, of the 435 victim or the perpetrator, the court shall order the person to 436 serve a minimum of 15 days in the county jail for a first 437 offense, 20 days for a second offense, and 30 days for a third 438 or subsequent offense as part of the sentence imposed, unless 439 the court sentences the person to a nonsuspended period of 440 incarceration in a state correctional facility. 441 Section 9.âPresent paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of 442 section 741.29, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 443 (j), a new paragraph (i) is added to that subsection, and 444 subsections (1) and (3) of that section are amended, to read: 445 741.29âDomestic violence; investigation of incidents; 446 notice to victims of legal rights and remedies; reporting.â 447 (1)âAny law enforcement officer who investigates an alleged 448 incident of domestic violence shall do all of the following: 449 (a)âStress the importance of seeking medical treatment and 450 assist the victim to obtain medical treatment if such is 451 required as a result of the alleged incident to which the 452 officer responds.; 453 (b)âAdvise the victim of such violence that there is a 454 domestic violence center from which the victim may receive 455 services.; 456 (c)âAdminister a lethality assessment consistent with the 457 requirements established in subsection (2) if the allegation of 458 domestic violence is against an intimate partner, regardless of 459 whether an arrest is made.; and 460 (d)âGive the victim immediate notice of the legal rights 461 and remedies available on a standard form developed and 462 distributed by the department. As necessary, the department 463 shall revise the Legal Rights and Remedies Notice to Victims to 464 include a general summary of s. 741.30 using simple English as 465 well as Spanish, and shall distribute the notice as a model form 466 to be used by all law enforcement agencies throughout this 467 state. The notice must include all of the following: 468 1.âThe resource listing, including telephone number, for 469 the area domestic violence center designated by the Department 470 of Children and Families. 471 2.âInformation on text-to-911 services and whether text-to 472 911 services are available in the victimâs jurisdiction.; and 473 3.2.âA copy of the following statement: 474 475 IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you may 476 ask the state attorney to file a criminal complaint. 477 You also have the right to go to court and file a 478 petition requesting an injunction for protection from 479 domestic violence which may include, but need not be 480 limited to, provisions which restrain the abuser from 481 further acts of abuse; direct the abuser to leave your 482 household; prevent the abuser from entering your 483 residence, school, business, or place of employment; 484 award you custody of your minor child or children; and 485 direct the abuser to pay support to you and the minor 486 children if the abuser has a legal obligation to do 487 so. 488 489 (e)âGive the victim a pamphlet developed and distributed by 490 the department which describes the short-term and long-term 491 effects of strangulation and the importance of seeking medical 492 treatment if the victim was strangled. 493 (2)âThe department shall consult with the Department of 494 Children and Families, the Florida Sheriffs Association, the 495 Florida Police Chiefs Association, the Florida Partnership to 496 End Domestic Violence, and at least two domestic violence 497 advocacy organizations to develop the policies, procedures, and 498 training necessary for implementation of a statewide evidence 499 based lethality assessment. Such policies, procedures, and 500 training must establish how to determine whether a victim and 501 aggressor are intimate partners and establish a statewide 502 process for referring a victim to a certified domestic violence 503 center. The group must review the questions in paragraph (e) and 504 make a recommendation as to whether all questions should be 505 included in the statewide lethality assessment instrument and 506 form. By January 1, 2025, the department must adopt a statewide 507 lethality assessment instrument and form. If a question in 508 paragraph (e) is eliminated from the assessment, the department 509 must confirm that the remaining or altered questions constitute 510 an evidence-based lethality assessment. By January 31, 2025, the 511 department shall report to the President of the Senate and the 512 Speaker of the House of Representatives the results and 513 recommendations of the group, including any proposed statutory 514 changes that are necessary for implementation of a statewide 515 lethality assessment. Training on how to administer a lethality 516 assessment and the approved lethality assessment form must be 517 accessible to a law enforcement officer in an online format. 518 (i)1.âIf a lethality assessment is administered, the law 519 enforcement officer must provide to both the victim and 520 aggressor a copy of the following statement: 521 522 Section 741.29, Florida Statutes, authorizes a law 523 enforcement officer or a designated representative of 524 the Department of Law Enforcement to follow up with an 525 alleged victim after a written police report based on 526 the investigation of an allegation that an incident of 527 domestic violence occurred is filed. A law enforcement 528 officer or designated representative may follow up 529 randomly in person or by telephone. 530 531 2.âIf the aggressor is not present at the time of the 532 lethality assessment or the law enforcement officer is otherwise 533 unable to provide a copy of the written statement required under 534 subparagraph 1. to the aggressor, the law enforcement officer 535 must leave a copy of the written statement at the home address 536 of the aggressor. 537 3.âIf a lethality assessment is administered, a law 538 enforcement officer, or a designated liaison within the 539 department, may follow up with the victim within 24 hours after 540 the written police report required under subsection (3) is 541 filed. The officer or liaison may follow up in person or by 542 telephone. If the officer or liaison follows up by telephone, he 543 or she must call the victim at least three times to satisfy the 544 requirement of this paragraph. The officer or liaison may not 545 leave a voicemail if the call goes unanswered. If the officer or 546 liaison does not reach the victim after three attempts, the 547 officer or liaison may conduct an in-person wellness check on 548 the victim. 549 (3)âWhen a law enforcement officer investigates an 550 allegation that an incident of domestic violence has occurred, 551 the officer shall handle the incident pursuant to the arrest 552 policy provided in s. 901.15(7), and as developed in accordance 553 with subsections (4)-(6). If a law enforcement officer is 554 wearing a body camera, as defined in s. 943.1718(1), the officer 555 must have the camera turned on and recording when investigating 556 an allegation that an incident of domestic violence has 557 occurred. Regardless of whether an arrest is made, the officer 558 shall make a written police report that is complete and clearly 559 indicates the alleged offense was an incident of domestic 560 violence. Such report must be given to the officerâs supervisor 561 and filed with the law enforcement agency in a manner that will 562 permit data on domestic violence cases to be compiled. Such 563 report must include all of the following: 564 (a)âA description of physical injuries observed, if any. 565 (b)âIf a law enforcement officer decides not to make an 566 arrest or decides to arrest two or more parties, the grounds for 567 not arresting anyone or for arresting two or more parties. 568 (c)âA statement that which indicates that a copy of the 569 legal rights and remedies notice was given to the victim. 570 (d)âA notation of the score of a lethality assessment, if 571 one was administered pursuant to paragraph (1)(c). 572 573 Whenever possible, the law enforcement officer shall obtain a 574 written statement from the victim and witnesses concerning the 575 alleged domestic violence. The officer shall submit the report 576 to the supervisor or other person to whom the employerâs rules 577 or policies require reports of similar allegations of criminal 578 activity to be made. The law enforcement agency shall, without 579 charge, send a copy of the initial police report, as well as any 580 subsequent, supplemental, or related report, which excludes 581 victim/witness statements or other materials that are part of an 582 active criminal investigation and are exempt from disclosure 583 under chapter 119, to the nearest locally certified domestic 584 violence center within 24 hours after the agencyâs receipt of 585 the report. The report furnished to the domestic violence center 586 must include a narrative description of the domestic violence 587 incident. 588 Section 10.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3), paragraph (b) 589 of subsection (6), and paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of 590 section 741.30, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 591 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 592 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 593 injunction; issuance of injunction; statewide verification 594 system; enforcement; public records exemption.â 595 (3) 596 (b)âThe verified petition shall be in substantially the 597 following form: 598 PETITION FOR 599 INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 600 AGAINST DOMESTIC VIOLENCE 601 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under penalties 602 of perjury that the following statements are true: 603 1.(a)âPetitioner resides at: ...(address)... 604 (Petitioner may furnish address to the court in a separate 605 confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the petitioner 606 requires the location of the current residence to be 607 confidential.) 608 2.(b)âRespondent resides at: ...(last known address)... 609 3.(c)âRespondentâs last known place of employment: ...(name 610 of business and address)... 611 4.(d)âPhysical description of respondent: 612 Race........ 613 Sex........ 614 Date of birth........ 615 Height........ 616 Weight........ 617 Eye color........ 618 Hair color........ 619 Distinguishing marks or scars........ 620 5.(e)âAliases of respondent: 621 6.(f)âRespondent is the spouse or former spouse of the 622 petitioner or is any other person related by blood or marriage 623 to the petitioner or is any other person who is or was residing 624 within a single dwelling unit with the petitioner, as if a 625 family, or is a person with whom the petitioner has a child in 626 common, regardless of whether the petitioner and respondent are 627 or were married or residing together, as if a family. 628 7.(g)âThe following describes any other cause of action 629 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent: 630 631 The petitioner should also describe any previous or pending 632 attempts by the petitioner to obtain an injunction for 633 protection against domestic violence in this or any other 634 circuit, and the results of that attempt: 635 636 Case numbers should be included if available. 637 8.(h)âPetitioner is either a victim of domestic violence or 638 has reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger 639 of becoming a victim of domestic violence because respondent 640 has: ...(mark all sections that apply and describe in the spaces 641 below the incidents of violence or threats of violence, 642 specifying when and where they occurred, including, but not 643 limited to, locations such as a home, school, place of 644 employment, or visitation exchange)... 645 ......................................................... 646 ......................................................... 647 ....committed or threatened to commit domestic violence 648 defined in s. 741.28, Florida Statutes, as any assault, 649 aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, 650 sexual battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false 651 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical 652 injury or death of one family or household member by another. 653 With the exception of persons who are parents of a child in 654 common, the family or household members must be currently 655 residing or have in the past resided together in the same single 656 dwelling unit. Refer to s. 741.28, Florida Statutes, to view the 657 enumerated criminal offenses that may constitute domestic 658 violence. 659 ....previously threatened, harassed, stalked, or physically 660 abused the petitioner. 661 ....attempted to harm the petitioner or family members or 662 individuals closely associated with the petitioner. 663 ....threatened to conceal, kidnap, or harm the petitionerâs 664 child or children. 665 ....intentionally injured or killed a family pet or used 666 the family pet as a means of coercive control. A family pet 667 includes a service animal as defined in s. 413.08(1), Florida 668 Statutes, and an emotional support animal as defined in s. 669 760.27(1), Florida Statutes. 670 ....used, or has threatened to use, against the petitioner 671 any weapons such as guns or knives. 672 ....physically restrained the petitioner from leaving the 673 home or calling law enforcement. 674 ....a criminal history involving violence or the threat of 675 violence (if known). 676 ....another order of protection issued against him or her 677 previously or from another jurisdiction (if known). 678 ....destroyed personal property, including, but not limited 679 to, telephones or other communication equipment, clothing, or 680 other items belonging to the petitioner. 681 ....engaged in a pattern of abusive, threatening, 682 intimidating, or controlling behavior composed of a series of 683 acts over a period of time, however short. 684 ....engaged in any other behavior or conduct that leads the 685 petitioner to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in 686 imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. 687 9.(i)âPetitioner alleges the following additional specific 688 facts: ...(mark appropriate sections)... 689 ....A minor child or minor children reside with the 690 petitioner whose names and ages are as follows: 691 692 ....Petitioner needs the exclusive use and possession of 693 the dwelling that the parties share. 694 ....Petitioner is unable to obtain safe alternative housing 695 because: 696 697 ....Petitioner genuinely fears that respondent imminently 698 will abuse, remove, or hide the minor child or children from 699 petitioner because: 700 701 10.(j)âPetitioner genuinely fears imminent domestic 702 violence by respondent. 703 11.(k)âPetitioner seeks an injunction: ...(mark appropriate 704 section or sections)... 705 ....Immediately restraining the respondent from committing 706 any acts of domestic violence. 707 ....Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of 708 domestic violence. 709 ....Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use 710 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or 711 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 712 ....Providing a temporary parenting plan, including a 713 temporary time-sharing schedule, with regard to the minor child 714 or children of the parties which might involve prohibiting or 715 limiting time-sharing or requiring that it be supervised by a 716 third party. 717 ....Designating that the exchange of the minor child or 718 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 719 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 720 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if 721 temporary time-sharing of the child is awarded to the 722 respondent. 723 ....Establishing temporary support for the minor child or 724 children or the petitioner. 725 ....Directing the respondent to participate in a batterersâ 726 intervention program. 727 ....Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the 728 protection of a victim of domestic violence, or any minor 729 children of the victim, including any injunctions or directives 730 to law enforcement agencies. 731 (6) 732 (b)âIn determining whether a petitioner has reasonable 733 cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a 734 victim of domestic violence, the court shall consider and 735 evaluate all relevant factors alleged in the petition, 736 including, but not limited to: 737 1.âThe history between the petitioner and the respondent, 738 including threats, harassment, stalking, and physical abuse. 739 2.âWhether the respondent has attempted to harm the 740 petitioner or family members or individuals closely associated 741 with the petitioner. 742 3.âWhether the respondent has threatened to conceal, 743 kidnap, or harm the petitionerâs child or children. 744 4.âWhether the respondent has intentionally injured or 745 killed a family pet or used the family pet as a means of 746 coercive control. A family pet includes a service animal as 747 defined in s. 413.08(1) and an emotional support animal as 748 defined in s. 760.27(1). 749 5.âWhether the respondent has used, or has threatened to 750 use, against the petitioner any weapons such as guns or knives. 751 6.âWhether the respondent has physically restrained the 752 petitioner from leaving the home or calling law enforcement. 753 7.âWhether the respondent has a criminal history involving 754 violence or the threat of violence. 755 8.âThe existence of a verifiable order of protection issued 756 previously or from another jurisdiction. 757 9.âWhether the respondent has destroyed personal property, 758 including, but not limited to, telephones or other 759 communications equipment, clothing, or other items belonging to 760 the petitioner. 761 10.âWhether the respondent has or had engaged in a pattern 762 of abusive, threatening, intimidating, or controlling behavior 763 composed of a series of acts over a period of time, however 764 short, which evidences a continuity of purpose and which 765 reasonably causes the petitioner to believe that the petitioner 766 or his or her minor child or children are in imminent danger of 767 becoming victims of any act of domestic violence. 768 11.âWhether the respondent engaged in any other behavior or 769 conduct that leads the petitioner to have reasonable cause to 770 believe that he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a 771 victim of domestic violence. 772 773 In making its determination under this paragraph, the court is 774 not limited to those factors enumerated in subparagraphs 1.-11. 775 (8) 776 (b)âA Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat Violence 777 Injunction Statewide Verification System is created within the 778 Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall establish, 779 implement, and maintain a statewide communication system capable 780 of electronically transmitting information to and between 781 criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 782 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence 783 injunctions, and repeat violence injunctions issued by the 784 courts throughout the state. Such information must include, but 785 is not limited to, information as to the existence and status of 786 any injunction for verification purposes. 787 Section 11.âPresent subsection (6) of section 741.31, 788 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7) and amended, 789 paragraph (d) is added to subsection (4) of that section, a new 790 subsection (6) is added to that section, and paragraph (c) of 791 subsection (4) and subsection (5) of that section are amended, 792 to read: 793 741.31âViolation of an injunction for protection against 794 domestic violence.â 795 (4) 796 (c)âA person who has a two or more prior conviction 797 convictions for a violation of an injunction or a foreign 798 protection order, and who subsequently commits another a 799 violation of any injunction or foreign protection order, 800 regardless of whether the violation is against the same victim, 801 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 802 s. 775.082, s. 775.083 or s. 775.084. For purposes of this 803 paragraph, the term âconvictionâ means a determination of guilt 804 which is the result of a plea or a trial, regardless of whether 805 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is 806 entered. 807 (d)1.âThe penalty for a felony or misdemeanor committed 808 under this section may be enhanced as follows: 809 a.âA misdemeanor of the second degree may be punished as if 810 it were a misdemeanor of the first degree. 811 b.âA misdemeanor of the first degree may be punished as if 812 it were a felony of the third degree. 813 c.âA felony of the third degree may be punished as if it 814 were a felony of the second degree. 815 d.âA felony of the second degree may be punished as if it 816 were a felony of the first degree. 817 e.âA felony of the first degree may be punished as if it 818 were a life felony. 819 2.âIn addition to the enhancements under subparagraph 1., 820 the penalty for a felony or misdemeanor committed under this 821 section during an emergency, as defined in s. 252.34(4), for 822 which a state of emergency is declared under s. 252.36 may be 823 enhanced if the offense occurred within the locale of the state 824 of emergency. 825 (5)âRegardless of whether or not there is a criminal 826 prosecution under subsection (4), the court: 827 (a)âShall order the respondent to attend a batterersâ 828 intervention program if it finds a willful violation of a 829 domestic violence injunction, unless the court makes written 830 factual findings in its judgment or order which are based on 831 substantial evidence, stating why a batterersâ intervention 832 program would be inappropriate. 833 (b)âMay order the respondent to electronic monitoring 834 supervision for the duration of the injunction for protection. 835 If electronic monitoring is ordered, the court must establish 836 exclusion zones and include safety planning and informed consent 837 for the petitioner. The respondent is responsible for paying for 838 the electronic monitoring services as provided in s. 948.09(2). 839 (6)âThe court shall order the respondent to electronic 840 monitoring supervision in any situation under s. 741.281(2). 841 (7)(6)âAny person who suffers an injury and/or loss as a 842 result of a violation of an injunction for protection against 843 domestic violence may be awarded economic damages for that 844 injury and/or loss by the court issuing the injunction. Damages 845 includes costs and attorney attorneysâ fees for enforcement of 846 the injunction. 847 Section 12.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) and subsections 848 (11) and (12) of section 784.046, Florida Statutes, are amended 849 to read: 850 784.046âAction by victim of repeat violence, sexual 851 violence, or dating violence for protective injunction; dating 852 violence investigations, notice to victims, and reporting; 853 pretrial release violations; public records exemption.â 854 (4) 855 (b)âThe verified petition must be in substantially the 856 following form: 857 858 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 859 AGAINST REPEAT VIOLENCE, SEXUAL 860 VIOLENCE, OR DATING VIOLENCE 861 862 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 863 penalties of perjury that the following statements are true: 864 865 1.âPetitioner resides at ...(address)... (A petitioner for 866 an injunction for protection against sexual violence may furnish 867 an address to the court in a separate confidential filing if, 868 for safety reasons, the petitioner requires the location of his 869 or her current residence to be confidential pursuant to s. 870 119.071(2)(j), Florida Statutes.) 871 2.âRespondent resides at ...(address).... 872 3.a.âPetitioner has suffered repeat violence as 873 demonstrated by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate 874 incidents of violence)... 875 876 877 878 879 880 b.âPetitioner has suffered sexual violence as demonstrated 881 by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate incident of 882 violence and include incident report number from law enforcement 883 agency or attach notice of inmate release)... 884 885 886 887 888 889 c.âPetitioner is a victim of dating violence and has 890 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 891 of becoming the victim of another act of dating violence or has 892 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 893 of becoming a victim of dating violence, as demonstrated by the 894 fact that the respondent has: ...(list the specific incident or 895 incidents of violence and describe the length of time of the 896 relationship, whether it has been in existence during the last 6 897 months, the nature of the relationship of a romantic or intimate 898 nature, the frequency and type of interaction, and any other 899 facts that characterize the relationship)... 900 901 902 903 904 905 4.âHas respondent engaged in a pattern of abusive, 906 threatening, intimidating, or controlling behavior composed of a 907 series of acts over a period of time, however short?... (if the 908 answer is yes, list the specific incident or incidents) ... 909 ......................................................... 910 ......................................................... 911 5.4.âPetitioner genuinely fears repeat violence by the 912 respondent. 913 6.5.âPetitioner seeks: an immediate injunction against the 914 respondent, enjoining him or her from committing any further 915 acts of violence; an injunction enjoining the respondent from 916 committing any further acts of violence; and an injunction 917 providing any terms the court deems necessary for the protection 918 of the petitioner and the petitionerâs immediate family, 919 including any injunctions or directives to law enforcement 920 agencies. 921 (11)âAny law enforcement officer who investigates an 922 alleged incident of dating violence shall do all of the 923 following: 924 (a)âStress the importance of seeking medical treatment and 925 assist the victim to obtain medical treatment if such is 926 required as a result of the alleged incident to which the 927 officer responds. 928 (b)âAny law enforcement officer who investigates an alleged 929 incident of dating violence shall Advise the victim of such 930 violence that there is a domestic violence center from which the 931 victim may receive services. 932 (c)âThe law enforcement officer shall Give the victim 933 immediate notice of the legal rights and remedies available on a 934 standard form developed and distributed by the Department of Law 935 Enforcement. As necessary, the Department of Law Enforcement 936 shall revise the Legal Rights and Remedies Notice to Victims to 937 include a general summary of this section, using simple English 938 as well as Spanish, and shall distribute the notice as a model 939 form to be used by all law enforcement agencies throughout the 940 state. The notice must shall include all of the following: 941 1.(a)âThe resource listing, including telephone number, for 942 the area domestic violence center designated by the Department 943 of Children and Families. 944 2.âInformation on text-to-911 services and whether text-to 945 911 services are available in the victimâs jurisdiction.; and 946 3.(b)âA copy of the following statement: 947 948 âIF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DATING VIOLENCE, you may ask 949 the state attorney to file a criminal complaint. You 950 also have the right to go to court and file a petition 951 requesting an injunction for protection from dating 952 violence which may include, but need not be limited 953 to, provisions that restrain the abuser from further 954 acts of abuse; direct the abuser to leave your 955 household; and prevent the abuser from entering your 956 residence, school, business, or place of employment.â 957 958 (d)âGive the victim a pamphlet developed and distributed by 959 the department which describes the short-term and long-term 960 effects of strangulation and the importance of seeking medical 961 treatment if the victim was strangled. 962 (e)âIf applicable, administer a lethality assessment 963 pursuant to s. 741.29(2)(e) and follow the requirements of s. 964 741.29(2)(f)-(i). 965 1. If a lethality assessment is administered, the law 966 enforcement officer must provide to both the victim and 967 aggressor a copy of the following statement: 968 969 Section 784.046, Florida Statutes, authorizes a law 970 enforcement officer or a designated representative of 971 the Department of Law Enforcement to follow up with an 972 alleged victim after a written police report based on 973 the investigation of an allegation that an incident of 974 dating violence occurred is filed. A law enforcement 975 officer or designated representative may follow up 976 randomly in person or by telephone. 977 978 2.âIf the aggressor is not present at the time of the 979 lethality assessment or the law enforcement officer is otherwise 980 unable to provide a copy of the written statement required under 981 subparagraph 1. to the aggressor, the law enforcement officer 982 must leave a copy of the written statement at the home address 983 of the aggressor. 984 3.âIf a lethality assessment is administered, a law 985 enforcement officer, or a designated liaison within the 986 department, may follow up with the victim within 24 hours after 987 the written police report required under subsection (3) is 988 filed. The officer or liaison may follow up in person or by 989 telephone. If the officer or liaison follows up by telephone, he 990 or she must call the victim at least three times to satisfy the 991 requirement of this subparagraph. The officer or liaison may not 992 leave a voicemail if the call goes unanswered. If the officer or 993 liaison does not reach the victim after three attempts, the 994 officer or liaison may conduct an in-person wellness check on 995 the victim. 996 (12)âWhen a law enforcement officer investigates an 997 allegation that an incident of dating violence has occurred, the 998 officer shall handle the incident pursuant to the arrest policy 999 provided in s. 901.15(7), and as developed in accordance with 1000 subsections (13), (14), and (16). If a law enforcement officer 1001 is wearing a body camera, as defined in s. 943.1718(1), the 1002 officer must have the camera turned on and recording when 1003 investigating an allegation that an incident of dating violence 1004 has occurred. Regardless of whether or not an arrest is made, 1005 the officer shall make a written police report that is complete 1006 and clearly indicates that the alleged offense was an incident 1007 of dating violence. Such report must shall be given to the 1008 officerâs supervisor and filed with the law enforcement agency 1009 in a manner that will permit data on dating violence cases to be 1010 compiled. Such report must include: 1011 (a)âA description of physical injuries observed, if any. 1012 (b)âIf a law enforcement officer decides not to make an 1013 arrest or decides to arrest two or more parties, the grounds for 1014 not arresting anyone or for arresting two or more parties. 1015 (c)âA statement that which indicates that a copy of the 1016 legal rights and remedies notice was given to the victim. 1017 1018 Whenever possible, the law enforcement officer shall obtain a 1019 written statement from the victim and witnesses concerning the 1020 alleged dating violence. The officer shall submit the report to 1021 the supervisor or other person to whom the employerâs rules or 1022 policies require reports of similar allegations of criminal 1023 activity to be made. The law enforcement agency shall, without 1024 charge, send a copy of the initial police report, as well as any 1025 subsequent, supplemental, or related report, which excludes 1026 victim or witness statements or other materials that are part of 1027 an active criminal investigation and are exempt from disclosure 1028 under chapter 119, to the nearest locally certified domestic 1029 violence center within 24 hours after the agencyâs receipt of 1030 the report. The report furnished to the domestic violence center 1031 must include a narrative description of the dating violence 1032 incident. 1033 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 784.047, Florida 1034 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (3) and (4) are added to 1035 that section, to read: 1036 784.047âPenalties for violating protective injunction 1037 against violators.â 1038 (2)âA person who has a two or more prior conviction 1039 convictions for a violation of an injunction or foreign 1040 protection order, and who subsequently commits another a 1041 violation of any injunction or foreign protection order, 1042 regardless of whether the violation is against the same victim, 1043 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 1044 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. For purposes of this 1045 subsection, the term âconvictionâ means a determination of guilt 1046 which is the result of a plea or a trial, regardless of whether 1047 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is 1048 entered. 1049 (3)(a)âThe penalty for a felony or misdemeanor committed 1050 under this section may be enhanced as follows: 1051 1.âA misdemeanor of the second degree may be punished as if 1052 it were a misdemeanor of the first degree. 1053 2.âA misdemeanor of the first degree may be punished as if 1054 it were a felony of the third degree. 1055 3.âA felony of the third degree may be punished as if it 1056 were a felony of the second degree. 1057 4.âA felony of the second degree may be punished as if it 1058 were a felony of the first degree. 1059 5.âA felony of the first degree may be punished as if it 1060 were a life felony. 1061 (b)âIn addition to the enhancements under paragraph (a), 1062 the penalty for a felony or misdemeanor committed under this 1063 section during an emergency, as defined in s. 252.34(4), for 1064 which a state of emergency is declared under s. 252.36 may be 1065 enhanced if the offense occurred within the locale of the state 1066 of emergency. 1067 (4)(a)âThe court may order the respondent to electronic 1068 monitoring supervision for the duration of the injunction for 1069 protection. If electronic monitoring is ordered, the court must 1070 establish exclusion zones and include safety planning and 1071 informed consent for the petitioner. The respondent is 1072 responsible for paying for the electronic monitoring services as 1073 provided in s. 948.09(2). 1074 (b)âThe court shall order the respondent to electronic 1075 monitoring supervision in any situation under s. 741.281(2). 1076 Section 14.âSubsection (1) of section 960.198, Florida 1077 Statutes, is amended to read: 1078 960.198âRelocation assistance for victims of domestic 1079 violence.â 1080 (1)âNotwithstanding the criteria set forth in s. 960.13 for 1081 crime victim compensation awards, the department may award a 1082 one-time payment of up to $5,000 $1,500 on any one claim and a 1083 lifetime maximum of $10,000 $3,000 to a victim of domestic 1084 violence who needs immediate assistance to escape from a 1085 domestic violence environment. 1086 Section 15.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1087 921.0024, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1088 921.0024âCriminal Punishment Code; worksheet computations; 1089 scoresheets.â 1090 (1) 1091 (b)âWORKSHEET KEY: 1092 Legal status points are assessed when any form of legal status 1093 existed at the time the offender committed an offense before the 1094 court for sentencing. Four (4) sentence points are assessed for 1095 an offenderâs legal status. 1096 Community sanction violation points are assessed when a 1097 community sanction violation is before the court for sentencing. 1098 Six (6) sentence points are assessed for each community sanction 1099 violation and each successive community sanction violation, 1100 unless any of the following apply: 1101 1.âIf the community sanction violation includes a new 1102 felony conviction before the sentencing court, twelve (12) 1103 community sanction violation points are assessed for the 1104 violation, and for each successive community sanction violation 1105 involving a new felony conviction. 1106 2.âIf the community sanction violation is committed by a 1107 violent felony offender of special concern as defined in s. 1108 948.06: 1109 a.âTwelve (12) community sanction violation points are 1110 assessed for the violation and for each successive violation of 1111 felony probation or community control where: 1112 I.âThe violation does not include a new felony conviction; 1113 and 1114 II.âThe community sanction violation is not based solely on 1115 the probationer or offenderâs failure to pay costs or fines or 1116 make restitution payments. 1117 b.âTwenty-four (24) community sanction violation points are 1118 assessed for the violation and for each successive violation of 1119 felony probation or community control where the violation 1120 includes a new felony conviction. 1121 1122 Multiple counts of community sanction violations before the 1123 sentencing court shall not be a basis for multiplying the 1124 assessment of community sanction violation points. 1125 Prior serious felony points: If the offender has a primary 1126 offense or any additional offense ranked in level 8, level 9, or 1127 level 10, and one or more prior serious felonies, a single 1128 assessment of thirty (30) points shall be added. For purposes of 1129 this section, a prior serious felony is an offense in the 1130 offenderâs prior record that is ranked in level 8, level 9, or 1131 level 10 under s. 921.0022 or s. 921.0023 and for which the 1132 offender is serving a sentence of confinement, supervision, or 1133 other sanction or for which the offenderâs date of release from 1134 confinement, supervision, or other sanction, whichever is later, 1135 is within 3 years before the date the primary offense or any 1136 additional offense was committed. 1137 1138 Prior capital felony points: If the offender has one or more 1139 prior capital felonies in the offenderâs criminal record, points 1140 shall be added to the subtotal sentence points of the offender 1141 equal to twice the number of points the offender receives for 1142 the primary offense and any additional offense. A prior capital 1143 felony in the offenderâs criminal record is a previous capital 1144 felony offense for which the offender has entered a plea of nolo 1145 contendere or guilty or has been found guilty; or a felony in 1146 another jurisdiction which is a capital felony in that 1147 jurisdiction, or would be a capital felony if the offense were 1148 committed in this state. 1149 1150 Possession of a firearm, semiautomatic firearm, or machine gun: 1151 If the offender is convicted of committing or attempting to 1152 commit any felony other than those enumerated in s. 775.087(2) 1153 while having in his or her possession: a firearm as defined in 1154 s. 790.001, an additional eighteen (18) sentence points are 1155 assessed; or if the offender is convicted of committing or 1156 attempting to commit any felony other than those enumerated in 1157 s. 775.087(3) while having in his or her possession a 1158 semiautomatic firearm as defined in s. 775.087(3) or a machine 1159 gun as defined in s. 790.001, an additional twenty-five (25) 1160 sentence points are assessed. 1161 1162 Sentencing multipliers: 1163 1164 Aggravated Animal Cruelty: If the primary offense is aggravated 1165 animal cruelty under s. 828.12(2), which included the knowing 1166 and intentional torture or torment of an animal that injured, 1167 mutilated, or killed the animal, the subtotal sentence points 1168 are multiplied by 1.25. As used in this paragraph, the term 1169 âanimalâ does not include an animal used for agricultural 1170 purposes or permitted as captive wildlife as authorized under s. 1171 379.303. 1172 1173 Drug trafficking: If the primary offense is drug trafficking 1174 under s. 893.135, the subtotal sentence points are multiplied, 1175 at the discretion of the court, for a level 7 or level 8 1176 offense, by 1.5. The state attorney may move the sentencing 1177 court to reduce or suspend the sentence of a person convicted of 1178 a level 7 or level 8 offense, if the offender provides 1179 substantial assistance as described in s. 893.135(4). 1180 1181 Violent offenses committed against specified justice system 1182 personnel: If the primary offense is a violation of s. 1183 775.0823(2), (3), or (4), the subtotal sentence points are 1184 multiplied by 2.5. If the primary offense is a violation of s. 1185 775.0823(5), (6), (7), (8), or (9), the subtotal sentence points 1186 are multiplied by 2.0. If the primary offense is a violation of 1187 s. 784.07(3) or s. 775.0875(1), or s. 775.0823(10) or (11), the 1188 subtotal sentence points are multiplied by 1.5. 1189 1190 Grand theft of a motor vehicle: If the primary offense is grand 1191 theft of the third degree involving a motor vehicle and in the 1192 offenderâs prior record, there are three or more grand thefts of 1193 the third degree involving a motor vehicle, the subtotal 1194 sentence points are multiplied by 1.5. 1195 1196 Fleeing or attempting to elude a law enforcement officer: If the 1197 primary offense is fleeing or attempting to elude a law 1198 enforcement officer or aggravated fleeing or eluding in 1199 violation of s. 316.1935, and in the offenderâs prior record, 1200 there is one or more violation of s. 316.1935, the subtotal 1201 sentence points are multiplied by 1.5. 1202 1203 Offense related to a criminal gang: If the offender is convicted 1204 of the primary offense and committed that offense for the 1205 purpose of benefiting, promoting, or furthering the interests of 1206 a criminal gang as defined in s. 874.03, the subtotal sentence 1207 points are multiplied by 1.5. If applying the multiplier results 1208 in the lowest permissible sentence exceeding the statutory 1209 maximum sentence for the primary offense under chapter 775, the 1210 court may not apply the multiplier and must sentence the 1211 defendant to the statutory maximum sentence. 1212 1213 Domestic violence in the presence of a child: If the offender is 1214 convicted of the primary offense and the primary offense is a 1215 crime of domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28, which was 1216 committed in the presence of a child under 16 years of age who 1217 is a family or household member, as defined in s. 741.28, s. 1218 741.28(3) with the victim or perpetrator, the subtotal sentence 1219 points are multiplied by 1.5. 1220 1221 Adult-on-minor sex offense: If the offender was 18 years of age 1222 or older and the victim was younger than 18 years of age at the 1223 time the offender committed the primary offense, and if the 1224 primary offense was an offense committed on or after October 1, 1225 2014, and is a violation of s. 787.01(2) or s. 787.02(2), if the 1226 violation involved a victim who was a minor and, in the course 1227 of committing that violation, the defendant committed a sexual 1228 battery under chapter 794 or a lewd act under s. 800.04 or s. 1229 847.0135(5) against the minor; s. 787.01(3)(a)2. or 3.; s. 1230 787.02(3)(a)2. or 3.; s. 794.011, excluding s. 794.011(10); s. 1231 800.04; or s. 847.0135(5), the subtotal sentence points are 1232 multiplied by 2.0. If applying the multiplier results in the 1233 lowest permissible sentence exceeding the statutory maximum 1234 sentence for the primary offense under chapter 775, the court 1235 may not apply the multiplier and must sentence the defendant to 1236 the statutory maximum sentence. 1237 Section 16.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 1238 943.0584, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1239 943.0584âCriminal history records ineligible for court 1240 ordered expunction or court-ordered sealing.â 1241 (2)âA criminal history record is ineligible for a 1242 certificate of eligibility for expunction or a court-ordered 1243 expunction pursuant to s. 943.0585 or a certificate of 1244 eligibility for sealing or a court-ordered sealing pursuant to 1245 s. 943.059 if the record is a conviction for any of the 1246 following offenses: 1247 (f)âAssault or battery, as defined in ss. 784.011 and 1248 784.03, respectively, of one family or household member by 1249 another family or household member, as defined in s. 741.28 s. 1250 741.28(3); 1251 Section 17.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 1252 943.171, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1253 943.171âBasic skills training in handling domestic violence 1254 cases.â 1255 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1256 (b)ââHousehold memberâ has the meaning set forth in s. 1257 741.28 s. 741.28(3). 1258 Section 18.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.